Florida, session 2026, SB2506.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 206.606, Florida 12 Statutes, is amended to read: 13 206.606âDistribution of certain proceeds.â 14 (1)âMoneys collected pursuant to ss. 206.41(1)(g) and 15 206.87(1)(e) shall be deposited in the Fuel Tax Collection Trust 16 Fund. Such moneys, after deducting the refunds granted pursuant 17 to s. 206.41 and the administrative costs incurred by the 18 department in collecting, administering, enforcing, and 19 distributing the tax, which administrative costs may not exceed 20 2 percent of collections, shall be distributed monthly to the 21 State Transportation Trust Fund, except that: 22 (a)âA sum equal to 0.5 percent of moneys collected $6.30 23 million shall be transferred to the Fish and Wildlife 24 Conservation Commission in each fiscal year and deposited in the 25 Invasive Plant Control Trust Fund to be used for aquatic plant 26 management, including nonchemical control of aquatic weeds, 27 research into nonchemical controls, and enforcement activities. 28 The commission shall allocate at least $1 million of such funds 29 to the eradication of melaleuca. 30 (b)âA sum equal to 0.2 percent of moneys collected 31 Annually, $2.5 million shall be transferred to the State Game 32 Trust Fund in the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission and 33 used for recreational boating activities and freshwater 34 fisheries management and research. The transfers must be made in 35 equal monthly amounts beginning on July 1 of each fiscal year. 36 The commission shall annually determine where unmet needs exist 37 for boating-related activities, and may fund such activities in 38 counties where, due to the number of vessel registrations, 39 sufficient financial resources are unavailable. 40 1.âA minimum of $1.25 million shall be used to fund local 41 projects to provide recreational channel marking and other 42 uniform waterway markers, public boat ramps, lifts, and hoists, 43 marine railways, and other public launching facilities, derelict 44 vessel removal, and other local boating-related activities. In 45 funding the projects, the commission shall give priority 46 consideration to: 47 a.âUnmet needs in counties having populations of 100,000 or 48 less. 49 b.âUnmet needs in coastal counties having a high level of 50 boating-related activities from individuals residing in other 51 counties. 52 2.âThe remaining sum $1.25 million may be used for 53 recreational boating activities and freshwater fisheries 54 management and research. 55 3.âThe commission may adopt rules to administer a Florida 56 Boating Improvement Program. 57 58 The commission shall prepare and make available on its Internet 59 website an annual report outlining the status of its Florida 60 Boating Improvement Program, including the projects funded, and 61 a list of counties whose needs are unmet due to insufficient 62 financial resources from vessel registration fees. 63 (c)âA sum equal to 1.15 0.65 percent of moneys collected 64 pursuant to s. 206.41(1)(g) shall be transferred to the 65 Agricultural Emergency Eradication Trust Fund. 66 (d)âA sum equal to 1.15 percent of moneys collected $13.4 67 million in fiscal year 2007-2008 and each fiscal year thereafter 68 of the moneys attributable to the sale of motor and diesel fuel 69 at marinas shall be transferred from the Fuel Tax Collection 70 Trust Fund to the Marine Resources Conservation Trust Fund in 71 the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission. 72 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 206.9945, Florida 73 Statutes, is amended to read: 74 206.9945âFunds collected; disposition; department 75 authority.â 76 (1)âThe department shall deposit all funds received and 77 collected by it under this part into the Fuel Tax Collection 78 Trust Fund to be transferred, less the costs of administration 79 and less the service charges to be deducted pursuant to s. 80 215.20, as follows: 81 (a)âMoneys collected pursuant to s. 206.9935(1) and tax 82 revenues collected pursuant to s. 207.003 at the rates specified 83 in s. 206.9935(3) shall be transferred to the Florida Coastal 84 Protection Trust Fund as provided in s. 376.11; 85 (b)âMoneys collected pursuant to s. 206.9935(2) shall be 86 transferred to the Water Quality Assurance Trust Fund as 87 provided in s. 376.307; and 88 (c)âThe first $150 million of moneys collected pursuant to 89 s. 206.9935(3), less any refunds granted under s. 206.9942, 90 shall be transferred to the Inland Protection Trust Fund as 91 provided in s. 376.3071. All remaining moneys collected pursuant 92 to s. 206.9935(3) shall be deposited into the General Revenue 93 Fund. This paragraph does not apply to moneys collected pursuant 94 to s. 207.003 and transferred pursuant to paragraph (a). 95 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.